Massachusetts, session 194th, H3761.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Notwithstanding any general or special law or rule to the contrary, the
secretary of transportation shall promulgate regulations relative to the registration and insurance
of electric bicycles and motorized scooters, as defined in section 1 of chapter 90 of the General
Laws; as well as any electric or motorized battery-powered vehicle capable of speeds exceeding
thirty miles per hour.
SECTION 2. Section 11B¾ of chapter 85 of the General Laws, as so appearing, is hereby
amended by inserting the following subsection:-
(i) No later than ten days after the purchase of an electric bicycle, the owner of such
bicycle shall fulfill all appropriate registration requirements with the registry of motor vehicles.
SECTION 3. Section 1E of chapter 90 of the General Laws, as so appearing, is hereby
amended by striking out the first sentence and inserting in place thereof the following:-
of 2

A motorized scooter shall not be operated on any way by a person who has not obtained
proper registration for the scooter with the registry of motor vehicles, or who does not possess a
valid driver's license or learner's permit, nor at a speed in excess of 20 miles per hour.
SECTION 4. Section 34J of Chapter 90 of the General Laws, as so appearing, is hereby
amended by inserting the following:-
For the purposes of this section, "motor vehicle" shall include electric bicycles
and motorized scooters, as defined in section one, or any electric or battery powered device
which is capable of being driven or ridden at speeds exceeding 20 miles per hour.
of 2